Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
INSPECTION SERVICE, WITHDRAWAL,

AND
COMPENSATION

§161-41 Inspection; compensation. All
poultry slaughtered by any slaughterhouse licensed under this part shall be
inspected by inspectors authorized by the department, both before and after slaughtering,
and no poultry shall be slaughtered, or after slaughter, be sold, transported,
offered for sale or transportation, or received for transportation, in
intrastate commerce unless the slaughtering or the use after slaughtering in
intrastate commerce is approved by an inspector.

The management of any processing establishment
or slaughterhouse, or the owner of any poultry to be slaughtered requiring the
services of an inspector in excess of eight consecutive hours on any workday,
or in excess of forty hours in any workweek, or on legal holidays, shall pay to
the department for any overtime inspection services the current state overtime
rate for each hour of work performed by the inspector.

The department shall pay the inspector, or
inspectors, for all overtime inspection services performed, provided that the
party requesting or requiring the overtime inspection services shall,
sufficiently in advance of the overtime period, arrange with the department for
the services. [L 1969, c 212, §27; am L 1993, c 92, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next